Maryland, session 2025, HB1436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1436*

HOUSE BILL 1436
5–304.
(a) (1) (i) The Interagency Commission shall prepare projections of school
construction and capital improvement needs for submission to the Capital Debt
Affordability Committee under § 8–112(c)(3) of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(ii) The projections shall be prepared in accordance with the
regulations adopted by the Interagency Commission under § 5–303 of this subtitle.
(III) 1. THE PROJECTIONS SHALL INCLUDE AN
INFLATIONARY ADJUSTMENT USING A COST OF CONSTRUCTION INFLATION INDEX.
2. IN ADDITION TO PROVIDING THE PROJECTIONS TO
THE CAPITAL DEBT AFFORDABILITY COMMITTEE, THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION
SHALL PROVIDE THE PROJECTIONS TO THE GOVERNOR FOR CONSIDERATION WHEN
SETTING THE ANNUAL ALLOCATION OF SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION FUNDS IN THE
CAPITAL BUDGET.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
8–108.
There is a Capital Debt Affordability Committee in the Executive Department.
8–112.
(a) The Committee shall review on a continuing basis the size and condition of
the State tax supported debt as well as other debt of State units, including the University
System of Maryland, Morgan State University, St. Mary’s College of Maryland, and the
Baltimore City Community College.
(b) On or before October 20 of each year, the Committee shall submit to the
Governor and the General Assembly the Committee’s estimate of the total amount of new
State debt that prudently may be authorized for the next fiscal year.
(c) In making the estimate, the Committee shall consider:
(3) capital improvement and school construction needs during the next 5
fiscal years, as projected by the Interagency Commission on School Construction;
8–113.
On or before November 1 of each year, after considering the current estimate of the
Committee, the Governor shall determine:

HOUSE BILL 1436 3
(1) the total authorizations of new State debt that the Governor considers
advisable for the next fiscal year; and
(2) the preliminary allocation of new State debt for:
(i) general construction projects;
(ii) school construction projects; and
(iii) other special projects.
Chapter 32 of the Acts of 2022, as amended by Chapter 354 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that:
(1) beginning in fiscal year 2023, within the current debt affordability
guidelines, the State should provide at least $450,000,000 each year for public school
construction in order to maintain a relatively stable number of funded projects in the
Capital Improvement Program; and
(2) the annual goal established under item (1) of this section:
(i) should be recalculated:
1. WITH AN INFLATIONARY ADJUSTMENT THAT USES A
COST OF CONSTRUCTION INFLATION INDEX; AND
2. prior to the Public School Facilities Priority Fund being
funded; and
(ii) does not include funding provided for public school construction
through the Built to Learn Program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.